Oklahoma, session 2026, SB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3241.21 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created the Maternity Care Pilot Program,


which shall be administered by the State Department of Health.


Through the pilot program, the Department shall select one hospital


to receive a one-time grant of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00)


to support the addition of labor and delivery services at the


hospital.


B. The hospital selected by the Department shall:


1. Be licensed by the Department;

Req. No. 518 Page 1


2. Be designated as a critical access hospital by the Centers


for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS);


3. Be organized as a charitable hospital that is exempt from


taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended;


4. Be owned by a municipality, county, or municipal or county


public trust;


5. Have been profitable for the two (2) consecutive years


immediately prior to application for the pilot program;


6. Not currently offer labor and delivery services;


7. Have space available to house a labor and delivery unit; and


8. Have at least one Certified Nurse-Midwife (CNM) on staff.


C. The Department shall develop an application process and


scoring criteria for evaluating applicants based on the


qualifications specified in subsection B of this section. The


Department shall review applicants and shall select the highest-


scoring hospital for the pilot program grant award.


D. The hospital awarded the pilot program grant under this


section may only use grant funds for:


1. Staffing costs for an obstetrics team including salary and


benefits;


2. Acquisition of essential equipment and supplies including,


but not limited to, medical instruments; and



Req. No. 518 Page 2


3. Educational classes related to maternal and infant health


including, but not limited to, childbirth education, breastfeeding


education, newborn care, and postpartum care.


Grant funds shall not be used for construction or renovation


costs.


E. The State Commissioner of Health may promulgate rules as


necessary to implement this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-518 DC 12/30/2024 4:50:31 PM





















Req. No. 518 Page 3